Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2218
Nursing; practices permitted.

The Nurse Practice Act confers no authority to practice medicine or
surgery. The Nurse Practice Act does not
prohibit:

(1) Home care provided by parents, foster parents, family, or friends if such person does not represent
or hold himself or herself out to be a nurse or use any designation in connection
with his or her name which tends to imply that he or she is licensed to practice
under the act;

(2) Home care provided
for compensation or gratuitously by a parent, foster parent, family member,
or friend if such person is a licensed nurse and represents or holds himself
or herself out to be a nurse and uses any designation in connection with his
or her name which tends to imply that he or she is licensed to practice under
the act;

(3) Christian Science nursing
consistent with the theology of Christian Science provided by a Christian
Science nurse who does not hold himself or herself out as a registered nurse
or a licensed practical nurse;

(4) Auxiliary patient care
services provided by persons carrying out duties under the direction of a
licensed practitioner;

(5) Auxiliary patient care
services provided by persons carrying out interventions for the support of
nursing service as delegated by a registered nurse or as assigned and directed
by a licensed practical nurse licensed under the act;

(6) The gratuitous rendering
of assistance by anyone in the case of an emergency;

(7) Nursing by any legally
licensed nurse of any other state whose engagement requires him or her to
(a) accompany and care for a patient temporarily residing in this state during
the period of one such engagement not to exceed six months in length, (b)
transport patients into, out of, or through this state provided each transport
does not exceed twenty-four hours, (c) provide patient care during periods
of transition following transport, (d) provide educational programs or consultative
services within this state for a period not to exceed fourteen consecutive
days if neither the education nor the consultation includes the provision
or the direction of patient care, and (e) provide nursing care in the case
of a disaster. These exceptions do not permit a person to represent or hold
himself or herself out as a nurse licensed to practice in this state;

(8) Nursing services rendered
by a student enrolled in an approved program of nursing when the services
are a part of the student's course of study;

(9) The practice of nursing
by any legally licensed nurse of another state who serves in the armed forces
of the United States or the United States Public Health Service or who is
employed by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs or other federal
agencies, if the practice is limited to that service or employment; or

(10) The practice of nursing,
if permitted by federal law, as a citizen of a foreign country temporarily
residing in Nebraska for a period not to exceed one year for the purpose of
postgraduate study, certified to be such by an appropriate agency satisfactory
to the board.

Laws 1953, c. 245, § 3, p. 836;

Laws 1955, c. 272, § 2, p. 854;

Laws 1975, LB 422, § 3;

Laws 1989, LB 342, § 20;

Laws 1991, LB 703, § 18;

Laws 1995, LB 563, § 8;

Laws 1996, LB 1155, § 24;

Laws 2002, LB 1062, § 20;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-1,132.06;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 774;

Laws 2012, LB1083, § 1.